Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 5 SHERIFF
30-10-527. Behavioral health professionals - grant applications encouraged - definition - repeal.

Each sheriff is encouraged to adopt a policy whereby mental health professionals, to the extent practicable, provide:

On-scene response services to support deputy sheriffs' handling of persons with mental health disorders; and

Counseling services to deputy sheriffs.

In implementing a policy as described in subsection (1) of this section, a sheriff shall not require a mental health professional to counsel both a person with a mental health disorder and a deputy sheriff if, in the judgment of the mental health professional, doing so would constitute a conflict of interest or a breach of a professional code of ethics.

For the purposes of this section, each sheriff's office is encouraged to apply annually for a grant from the peace officers behavioral health support and community partnerships grant program created in section 24-32-3501.

As used in this section, "mental health professional" means a mental health professional licensed to practice medicine pursuant to article 240 of title 12 or a person licensed as a mental health professional pursuant to article 245 of title 12.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1215), ch. 150, p. 506, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1718, § 211, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1030), ch. 354, p. 2306, § 3, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1030, see section 1 of chapter 354, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.